North Carolina, session 2025, SB78.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 145 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 145-52. Official Fried Apple Pie Festival.
The Fried Apple Pie Festival, held the first Saturday in the month of May of every year in the
Town of Sparta, is adopted as the official Fried Apple Pie Festival of the State of North Carolina."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S78-v-1*